New York, session 2025-2026, A7079.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 25.23 of the arts and cultural affairs law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Online resale marketplaces shall require all ticket sellers to have 4 an account on such marketplace to post anything for sale on such market- 5 place. Such account shall include the name and a photo of the seller 6 which shall be verified by the marketplace by being sent a copy of 7 government issued photo identification. Purchasers shall be shown the 8 name and photo of the seller before being allowed to complete the trans- 9 action. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 12 25.23 of the arts and cultural affairs law made by section one of this 13 act shall not affect the repeal and reversion of such section and shall 14 be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06531-01-5